dev/infreq-apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="r/ive__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eiv</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivast</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iva</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ive</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ive</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ivi</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iv</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ive</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pass"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iv</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ryk/ke__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kast</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ker</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ke</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="slem/me__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mar</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mast</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tref/fast__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fast</l>
          <r>fast<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fest</l>
          <r>fast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>fast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>test</l>
          <r>fast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tyl/le__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>last</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="un/ast__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ast</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>est</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>test</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/ere__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erast</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ere</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ore</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ori</l>
          <r>ere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/emjat__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amdest</l>
          <r>emjat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amst</l>
          <r>emjat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amtest</l>
          <r>emjat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emjast</l>
          <r>emjat<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emst</l>
          <r>emjat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="skjekke"><i>skjek</i><par n="ryk/ke__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="råskrelle"><i>råskrel</i><par n="tyl/le__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="føreskrive"><i>føreskr</i><par n="r/ive__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fortrykke"><i>fortryk</i><par n="ryk/ke__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="føretrekke"><i>føretrek</i><par n="ryk/ke__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tverrykke"><i>tverryk</i><par n="ryk/ke__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="klykke"><i>klyk</i><par n="ryk/ke__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skyldskrive"><i>skyldskr</i><par n="r/ive__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tverr-rykke"><i>tverr-ryk</i><par n="ryk/ke__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ombere"><i>omb</i><par n="b/ere__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="blodvekke"><i>blodvek</i><par n="ryk/ke__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fråskrive"><i>fråskr</i><par n="r/ive__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="innebere"><i>inneb</i><par n="b/ere__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skrykke"><i>skryk</i><par n="ryk/ke__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="førebere"><i>føreb</i><par n="b/ere__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="utykke"><i>utyk</i><par n="ryk/ke__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="skuldskrive"><i>skuldskr</i><par n="r/ive__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="krykke"><i>kryk</i><par n="ryk/ke__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tvisynast">	 <i>tvisyn</i><par n="un/ast__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="unast">		 <i>un</i><par n="un/ast__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vønast">		 <i>vøn</i><par n="un/ast__vblex"/></e>
